Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.335

Order form—Additional provision authorized—Payment by withdrawal.

The order form distributed pursuant to RCW 32.32.315 may provide that it may not be modified without the applicant's consent after its receipt by the applicant. If payment is to be made by withdrawal from a savings account the applicant may, but need not, cause the withdrawal to be made upon receipt of the order form. If the withdrawal is made at any time prior to the closing date of the public offering, the applicant shall pay interest to the account holder on the account withdrawn as if the amount had remained in the account from which it was withdrawn until the closing date.

[ 1981 c 85 s 66.]